Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-164
Vital resource emergency; Governor declare; when; termination.

A vital resource emergency shall be declared by the Governor if he or she finds that a vital resource crisis is imminent or has occurred. Such declaration shall be promptly filed with the Secretary of State. The state of emergency shall continue until the Governor finds that the threat or danger has passed or that the vital resource emergency has been dealt with to the extent that emergency conditions no longer exist and therefor terminates the state of emergency by proclamation. No state of emergency shall continue for longer than fifteen days unless renewed by proclamation of the Governor. The Legislature may terminate a state of emergency at any time, upon passage of a resolution.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 53.